Indiana, session 2026, HB1342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
council is urged to assign to an appropriate study committee
during the 2026 interim the task of studying the following:
(1) Whether the executive (as defined in IC 36-1-2-5) should
implement a process to:
(A) publish proposed district boundaries; and
(B) during a regular meeting, hold a public hearing
concerning proposed district boundaries;
before adopting an ordinance to establish or revise districts.
(2) Requirements of how the districts should be comprised.
(3) Specific processes for a county having a population of
more than four hundred fifty thousand (450,000) and less than
seven hundred thousand (700,000), or a county having a
population of more than one hundred eighty-five thousand
(185,000) and less than three hundred thousand (300,000).
(c) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
HEA 1342 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1342 — Concur